Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/hi_affix.dat
# 
# This affix file is based on the Ispell one which is under the following
# copyright:
#
# Copyright 1992, 1993, 1999, 2000, 2001, Geoff Kuenning, Claremont, CA
# All rights reserved.
#
# Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
# modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
# are met:
#
# 1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
#    notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
# 2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
#    notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
#    documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
# 3. All modifications to the source code must be clearly marked as
#    such.  Binary redistributions based on modified source code
#    must be clearly marked as modified versions in the documentation
#    and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
# (clause 4 removed with permission from Geoff Kuenning)
# 5. The name of Geoff Kuenning may not be used to endorse or promote
#    products derived from this software without specific prior
#    written permission.
#
# THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY GEOFF KUENNING AND CONTRIBUTORS `AS IS'' AND
# ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE
# IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE
# ARE DISCLAIMED.  IN NO EVENT SHALL GEOFF KUENNING OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE
# FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL
# DAMAGES (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS
# OR SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION)
# HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT
# LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY
# OUT OF THE USE OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF
# SUCH DAMAGE.
#

SET UTF-8

SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 ओं  ा

SFX B Y 1
SFX B 0 यें  ा

SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 एँ  ा

SFX D Y 1
SFX D 0 का [नस]

SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 की [नस]

SFX F Y 1
SFX F ा ी ा

SFX G Y 1
SFX G ी ियाँ ी
